zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子游戏机配件 > 掌机配件: 掌机盒; 便携式游戏机手柄; 便携式游戏机握把和保护套; 便携式游戏机替换部件; 掌机屏幕保护膜; 掌机保护罩; 便携式游戏机支架; 便携式游戏机触控笔
es: Electrónica > Accesorios para videoconsolas > Accesorios para consolas portátiles: Estuches para consolas portátiles; Controles de consola de videojuegos portátil; Agarres y cubiertas protectoras de consola de videojuegos portátil; Partes de repuesto de consola de videojuegos portátil; Protectores de pantalla para consolas portátiles; Máscaras para consolas portátiles; Soportes y monturas de consola de videojuegos portátil; Lápices táctiles de consola de videojuegos portátil
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電動遊戲機配件 > 可攜式遊戲主機配件: 攜帶型遊戲機盒; 攜帶式遊戲機控制器; 攜帶式遊戲機握把及保護套; 攜帶式遊戲機替換零件; 攜帶型遊戲機螢幕保護貼; 攜帶型遊戲機外殼; 攜帶式遊戲機架及安裝架; 攜帶式遊戲機觸控筆
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện bảng điều khiển giao tiếp trò chơi điện tử > Phụ kiện máy chơi game cầm tay: Hộp đựng máy chơi game cầm tay; Bộ điều khiển máy chơi game di động; Tay cầm và vỏ bảo vệ máy chơi game di động; Linh kiện thay thế máy chơi game di động; Miếng dán bảo vệ màn hình máy chơi game cầm tay; Miếng dán máy chơi game cầm tay; Giá và giá gắn máy chơi game di động; Bút stylus máy chơi game di động
ko: 전자기기 > 비디오 게임 콘솔 부대용품 > 휴대용 게임기 부대용품: 휴대용 게임기 케이스; 휴대용 게임 콘솔 컨트롤러; 휴대용 게임 콘솔 그립 및 보호 커버; 휴대용 게임 콘솔 교체 부품; 휴대용 게임기 화면 보호용품; 휴대용 게임기 스킨; 휴대용 게임 콘솔 스탠드 및 마운트; 휴대용 게임 콘솔 스타일러스 펜
sk-SK: Elektronika > Príslušenstvo pre konzoly na videohry > Príslušenstvo pre prenosné herné konzoly: Puzdrá na prenosné herné konzoly; Ovládače prenosných herných konzol; Gripy a ochranné kryty prenosných herných konzol; Náhradné diely prenosných herných konzol; Chrániče obrazovky prenosnej hernej konzoly; Skiny prenosnej hernej konzoly; Stojany a držiaky prenosných herných konzol; Dotykové perá prenosných herných konzol
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์คอนโซลวิดีโอเกม > อุปกรณ์คอนโซลเกมแบบพกพา: เคสเครื่องเกมคอนโซลแบบพกพา; จอยคอนโทรลเลอร์เครื่องเกมพกพา; กริปและเคสป้องกันเครื่องเกมพกพา; ชิ้นส่วนทดแทนเครื่องเกมพกพา; ตัวป้องกันหน้าจอเครื่องเกมคอนโซลแบบพกพา; สกินเครื่องเกมคอนโซลแบบพกพา; ขาตั้งและขายึดเครื่องเกมพกพา; ปากกาสไตลัสเครื่องเกมพกพา
it: Elettronica > Accessori console videogiochi > Accessori console portatili: Custodie per console di gioco portatili; Controller per console di gioco portatili; Impugnature e custodie protettive per console di gioco portatili; Parti di ricambio per console di gioco portatili; Proteggi schermo per console di gioco portatili; Skin per console di gioco portatili; Supporti e staffe per console di gioco portatili; Penne stilo per console di gioco portatili
tr: Elektronik > Video Oyun Konsolu Aksesuarları > Taşınabilir Oyun Konsolu Aksesuarları: Taşınabilir Oyun Konsolu Kılıfları; Taşınabilir Oyun Konsolu Oyun Kumandaları; Taşınabilir Oyun Konsolu Tutamakları ve Koruyucu Kapakları; Taşınabilir Oyun Konsolu Yedek Parçaları; Taşınabilir Oyun Konsolu Ekran Koruyucuları; Taşınabilir Oyun Konsolu Kaplamaları; Taşınabilir Oyun Konsolu Stantları ve Montaj Aparatları; Taşınabilir Oyun Konsolu Stylus Kalemleri
fi: Elektroniikka > Videopelikonsolien lisätarvikkeet > Kannettavien pelikonsolien lisätarvikkeet: Kannettavien pelikonsolien kotelot; Kannettavan pelikonsolin ohjain; Kannettavan pelikonsolin kahvakotelo ja suojakuori; Kannettavan pelikonsolin varaosa; Kannettavien pelikonsolien näytönsuojat; Kannettavien pelikonsolien kalvot; Kannettavan pelikonsolin teline ja kiinnike; Kannettavan pelikonsolin kynäkosketin
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor videogameconsoles > Accessoires voor draagbare gameconsole: Dozen voor draagbare gameconsole; Draagbare gameconsole-controllers; Draagbare gameconsole-grips en beschermhoezen; Draagbare gameconsole reserveonderdelen; Screenprotectors voor draagbare gameconsole; Skins voor draagbare gameconsole; Draagbare gameconsole statieven en bevestigingen; Draagbare gameconsole stylus-pennen
cs: Elektronika > Herní konzole – příslušenství > Přenosné herní konzole – příslušenství: Přenosné herní konzole – pouzdra; Ovladače přenosných herních konzolí; Držadla a ochranné kryty přenosných herních konzolí; Náhradní díly přenosných herních konzolí; Přenosné herní konzole – chrániče obrazovky; Přenosné herní konzole – skiny; Stojany a držáky přenosných herních konzolí; Stylusová pera přenosných herních konzolí
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для игровых консолей > Аксессуары для портативных игровых консолей: Чехлы для портативных игровых консолей; Контроллеры для портативных игровых консолей; Ручки и защитные чехлы для портативных игровых консолей; Запасные части для портативных игровых консолей; Пленки и стекла для экранов портативных игровых консолей; Декоративные чехлы и наклейки для портативных игровых консолей; Подставки и крепления для портативных игровых консолей; Стилусы для портативных игровых консолей
lt-LT: Elektronika > Vaizdo žaidimų konsolių priedai > Nešiojamųjų žaidimų konsolių priedai: Nešiojamųjų žaidimų konsolių dėklai; Nešiojamų žaidimų konsolių valdikliai; Nešiojamų žaidimų konsolių rankenos ir apsauginiai dėklai; Nešiojamų žaidimų konsolių pakaitinės dalys; Nešiojamųjų žaidimų konsolių ekrano apsaugos; Nešiojamųjų žaidimų konsolių apvalkalai; Nešiojamų žaidimų konsolių stovai ir tvirtinimai; Nešiojamų žaidimų konsolių adatėlės tipo rašikliai
ja: 電子機器 > ゲーム機関連用品 > 携帯型ゲーム機関連用品: 携帯型ゲーム機ケース; 携帯ゲーム機コントローラー; 携帯ゲーム機グリップと保護カバー; 携帯ゲーム機交換部品; 携帯型ゲーム機のスクリーンプロテクター; 携帯型ゲーム機スキン; 携帯ゲーム機スタンドとマウント; 携帯ゲーム機用スタイラス
hr-HR: Elektronika > Dodaci za konzole za video igre > Dodaci za prijenosne igraće konzole: Torbice za prijenosne igraće konzole; Kontroleri za prijenosne igraće konzole; Ručice i zaštitni pokrovi za prijenosne igraće konzole; Zamjenski dijelovi za prijenosne igraće konzole; Zaštitne folije za ekrane prijenosnih igraćih konzola; Navlake za prijenosne igraće konzole; Stalci i nosači za prijenosne igraće konzole; Olovke za prijenosne igraće konzole
de: Elektronik > Zubehör für Videospielkonsolen > Zubehör für mobile Spielkonsolen: Hüllen für mobile Spielkonsolen; Tragbare-Spielkonsolen-Controller; Tragbare-Spielkonsolen-Griffe und -Schutzhüllen; Tragbare-Spielkonsolen-Ersatzteile; Displayschutzfolien für mobile Spielekonsolen; Masken für mobile Spielkonsolen; Tragbare-Spielkonsolen-Ständer und -Halterungen; Tragbare-Spielkonsolen-Eingabestifte
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за конзоли за видеоигри > Аксесоари за преносими игрови конзоли: Калъфи за преносими игрови конзоли; Контролери за преносима игрова конзола; Ръкохватки и предпазни калъфи за преносима игрова конзола; Резервни части за преносима игрова конзола; Протектори за екрани на преносими игрови конзоли; Обложки за преносими игрови конзоли; Стойки и стативи за преносима игрова конзола; Стилус писалки за преносима игрова конзола
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ κονσολών βιντεοπαιχνιδιών > Αξεσουάρ φορητών κονσολών παιχνιδιών: Θήκες φορητών κονσολών παιχνιδιών; Χειριστήρια φορητής κονσόλας παιχνιδιών; Χειρολαβές & προστατευτικά καλύμματα φορητής κονσόλας παιχνιδιών; Ανταλλακτικά φορητής κονσόλας παιχνιδιών; Προστατευτικά οθόνης φορητών κονσολών παιχνιδιών; Καλύμματα φορητών κονσολών παιχνιδιών; Βάσεις & στηρίγματα φορητής κονσόλας παιχνιδιών; Γραφίδες για φορητή κονσόλας παιχνιδιών
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii pentru console de jocuri video > Accesorii pentru console de jocuri portabile: Cutii pentru console de jocuri portabile; Controlere pentru console portabile; Mânere și huse de protecție pentru console portabile; Piese de schimb pentru console portabile; Protecții de ecran pentru console de jocuri portabile; Skinuri pentru console de jocuri portabile; Suporturi și montaje pentru console portabile; Stilouri pentru console portabile
sv: Elektronik > Tillbehör till dataspelskonsoler > Tillbehör till portabla spelkonsoler: Bärbara spelkonsolfodral; Bärbara spelkonsolkontroller; Bärbara spelkonsolhandtag och skyddsöverdrag; Ersättningsdelar till bärbara spelkonsoler; Bärbara skärmskydd för spelkonsoler; Bärbara spelkonsolskinn; Bärbara spelkonsolstativ och -fästen; Bärbara spelkonsolpennor
sl-SI: Elektronika > Dodatki za igralne konzole > Dodatki za prenosne igralne konzole: Ohišja za prenosne igralne konzole; Krmilniki za prenosne igralne konzole; Ročaji in zaščitne prevleke za prenosne igralne konzole; Nadomestni deli za prenosne igralne konzole; Zaščitne folije za zaslone prenosnih igralnih konzol; Nalepke za prenosne igralne konzole; Stojala in nosilci za prenosne igralne konzole; Pisala stylus za prenosne igralne konzole
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para consoles de videogame > Acessórios para consoles de jogo portáteis: Estojos para consoles de jogo portáteis; Controles para console de jogos portátil; Empunhadura e capas protetoras para console de jogos portátil; Peças de reposição para console de jogos portátil; Protetores de tela para consoles de jogo portáteis; Skins para consoles de jogo portáteis; Suportes e suportes para console de jogos portátil; Canetas stylus para console de jogos portátil
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria do gier wideo > Akcesoria do przenośnych konsol do gier: Futerały do przenośnych konsol do gier; Kontrolery przenośnych konsol gier; Uchwyty i ochronne pokrywy przenośnych konsol gier; Części zamienne przenośnych konsol gier; Osłony na ekran do przenośnych konsol do gier; Nakładki na przenośne konsole do gier; Stojaki i uchwyty przenośnych konsol gier; Pióra stylusa przenośnych konsol gier
hu: Elektronika > Videojátékkonzol-kiegészítők > Hordozható játékkonzol-kiegészítők: Hordozható játékkonzol-tokok; Hordozható játékkonzol-vezérlők; Hordozható játékkonzol-markolatok és -védőborítások; Hordozható játékkonzol-cserealkatrészek; Hordozható játékkonzol-képernyővédők; Hordozható játékkonzol-huzatok; Hordozható játékkonzolállványok és -tartók; Hordozható játékkonzol-érintőceruzák
nb: Elektronikk > Tilbehør til spillkonsoller > Tilbehør til portable spillkonsoller: Etuier til portable spillkonsoller; Bærbare spillkonsollkontrollere; Bærbare spillkonsoll-grep og beskyttelsesdeksler; Bærbare spillkonsoll reservedeler; Skjermbeskyttere til portable spillkonsoller; Trekk til portable spillkonsoller; Bærbare spillkonsollstativer og fester; Bærbare spillkonsoll styluspenner
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios de consola de videojogos > Acessórios de consola de jogos portáteis: Capas para consolas de jogos portáteis; Comandos de consola de jogos portátil; Pegas e capas protetoras de consola de jogos portátil; Peças de substituição de consola de jogos portátil; Protetores de ecrã para consolas de jogos portáteis; Coberturas para consolas de jogos portáteis; Bases e suportes de consola de jogos portátil; Canetas stylus de consola de jogos portátil
en: Electronics > Video Game Console Accessories > Portable Game Console Accessories: Portable Game Console Cases; Portable Game Console Controllers; Portable Game Console Grips & Protective Covers; Portable Game Console Replacement Parts; Portable Game Console Screen Protectors; Portable Game Console Skins; Portable Game Console Stands & Mounts; Portable Game Console Stylus Pens
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires pour consoles de jeu vidéo > Accessoires pour consoles de jeu portables: Étuis pour consoles de jeux portables; Contrôleurs pour console de jeu portable; Poignées et coques de protection pour console de jeu portable; Pièces de rechange pour console de jeu portable; Protecteurs d’écran pour consoles de jeux portables; Apparences de consoles de jeux portables; Supports et fixations pour console de jeu portable; Stylets pour console de jeu portable
da: Elektronik > Videospilkonsol – tilbehør > Tilbehør til bærbar spilkonsol: Etuier til bærbar spilkonsol; Controllere til bærbare spilkonsoller; Greb og beskyttelsesovertræk til bærbare spilkonsoller; Reservedele til bærbar spilkonsol; Skærmbeskyttere til bærbar spilkonsol; Betræk til bærbar spilkonsol; Stativer og beslag til bærbar spilkonsoller; Styluspenne til bærbare spilkonsoller